Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.528

Contracts with adjacent college district for administrative services.

If a technical college is created after September 1, 1991, that college may contract with an adjacent college district for administrative services until such time that an existing or new college district may assume jurisdiction over the college.

[ 1991 c 238 s 139.]